Utah statutes.
76-5-309.   Human trafficking and human smuggling -- Penalties.

(1)  Human trafficking for forced labor and human trafficking for forced sexual exploitation are each a second degree felony, except under Section 76-5-310.

(2)  Human smuggling of one or more human beings for profit or for a commercial purpose is a third degree felony, except under Section 76-5-310.

(3)  Human trafficking and human smuggling are each a separate offense from any other crime committed in relationship to the commission of either of these offenses.

(4)  A person who benefits financially or materially by receiving anything of value from knowing participation in:

(a)  human trafficking is guilty of a second degree felony; and

(b)  human smuggling is guilty of a third degree felony.

(5)  A person commits a separate offense of human trafficking or human smuggling for each person who is smuggled or trafficked under Section 76-5-308 or 76-5-310.

